North Carolina, session 2025, SB619.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 42.
"Academic Support Programs.
"§ 115C-650. Establish AI Academic Support Program.
(a) Purpose; Program. – There is established the AI Instructional Support Program
(Program) to allow public school units to contract with Khan Academy, Inc. (Khan Academy)
for use of the academic support service Khanmigo, in grades six through 12. Khanmigo is an
application that uses artificial intelligence to support teachers with lesson plan development and
to support students with lesson comprehension.
(b) Funding. – Funds shall be allocated to each public school unit on the basis of average
daily membership (ADM) in grades six through 12 in the public school unit for the purposes set
out in this section.
(c) Funding Use. – Public school units that utilize funds pursuant to this section shall use
all funds to contract with Khan Academy for use of the Khanmigo service, any associated
professional development, and the rostering programs required pursuant to subsection (e).
(d) Contract Term. – Public school units entering into contracts with Khan Academy shall
contract for a term of one year. At the end of each school year, each public school unit shall
evaluate the use of Khanmigo services in the public school unit prior to contracting with Khan
Academy for the subsequent school year. The evaluation shall include all of the information
required to be reported on by the Department of Public Instruction in subdivisions (2) through
(7) of subsection (g) of this section. Public school units shall submit their evaluations to the
Department of Public Instruction by July 15 of each year that funds are used pursuant to this
section.
(e) Class Rostering for Khanmigo. – All public school units that contract with Khan
Academy pursuant to this section shall use a secure, cloud-based, single sign-on and class
rostering platform to manage access to digital instructional resources and student information
systems and to facilitate automated data integration between educational applications and school
district systems. Class rostering products used pursuant to this section must be approved by the
Department.
(f) Juvenile Justice. – The Department shall contract with Khan for 500 Khanmigo
licenses for use in schools operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of
*S619-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Public Safety. The Department of Public Instruction shall provide technical support to the
Division of Juvenile Justice for the use of Khanmigo. The Division of Juvenile Justice shall
comply with evaluation requirements pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(f) Study. – The Office of Learning Research at the North Carolina Collaboratory (OLR)
shall design and conduct a study to measure the effectiveness of using Khanmigo, including any
impact on student performance and growth. As part of the study, the Department of Public
Instruction shall aggregate and report to OLR on the evaluations submitted by public school units
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. OLR shall collaborate with Khan Academy to aggregate
data on student performance by teacher and by subgroup, to the extent allowed by law. OLR shall
provide the results of this study to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later
than April 1, 2028.
(g) Report. – No later than February 15 of each year in which funds are made available
for the Program, the Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee at least the following information:
(1) The number public school units that contracted with Khan Academy pursuant
to this article.
(2) The number of students using the Khanmigo application.
(3) The average number of minutes and interactions students had with the
Khanmigo application weekly.
(4) The number of teachers using the application.
(5) The average number of minutes and interactions teachers had with the
Khanmigo application weekly.
(6) Any identified impact on student outcomes.
(7) Any identified impact on teacher performance.
(8) The number of moderation flags generated by the application."
SECTION 2. It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate from the General
Fund to the Department of Public Instruction the sum of ten million sixty thousand five hundred
sixty dollars ($10,060,560) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to allocate funds
pursuant to G.S. 115C-650, as established by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when the Current Operations Appropriations Act
of 2025 becomes law and if that bill appropriates funds for the purposes detailed in this act in the
amounts set out in Section 2 of this act.
Page 2 Senate Bill 619-First Edition